Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 2

Tennessee Affordable Drug Act of 2005

53-10-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Affordable Drug Act of 2005.”

Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 53-10-201 — 53-10-206 (Acts 1977, ch. 66, §§ 1-5, 9; T.C.A., §§ 52-1221 — 52-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 505, § 1; 1992, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 1), concerning substitution of generic drugs, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 2005. For provisions on affordable drugs, see this part 2.

Cross-References. Affordable health insurance for the uninsured, title 56, ch. 7, part 6.

Medical Assistance Act, title 71, ch. 5, part 1.

Prescription drug programs, title 71, ch. 2, part 5.

Pharmaceutical connection program, title 71, ch. 5, part 5.

Volunteer Rx discount drug program, title 56, ch. 57, part 1.

Comparative Legislation. Affordable drug provisions:

Ala. Code § 36-35-1 et seq.

Ark. § 20-76-501 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 26-4-140 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 43-61-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 2.2-214.1

53-10-202. Legislative intent.

The general assembly declares it to be the public policy that, in order to lower the cost of prescription drugs to its citizens, pharmacists may substitute less costly generic drugs or drug products for higher priced brand name or trade name drugs or drug products.

Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 53-10-201 — 53-10-206 (Acts 1977, ch. 66, §§ 1-5, 9; T.C.A., §§ 52-1221 — 52-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 505, § 1; 1992, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 1), concerning substitution of generic drugs, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 2005. For provisions on affordable drugs, see this part 2.

Cross-References. Affordable health insurance for the uninsured, title 56, ch. 7, part 6.

Medical Assistance Act, title 71, ch. 5, part 1.

Prescription drug programs, title 71, ch. 2, part 5.

Pharmaceutical connection program, title 71, ch. 5, part 5.

Volunteer Rx discount drug program, title 56, ch. 57, part 1.

53-10-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Biological product” has the same meaning as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 262(i);

“Brand name” means the registered trademark name of a drug or drug product given by its manufacturer, labeler or distributor;

“Finished dosage form” means that form of a drug that is, or is intended to be, dispensed or administered to a patient and requires no further manufacturing or processing other than packaging, reconstitution or labeling;

“Generic equivalent” means a drug product that has the same established name, active ingredients, strength or concentration, dosage form, and route of administration and that is formulated to contain the same amount of active ingredients, in the same dosage form, and to meet the same compendial or other applicable standards, i.e. strength, quality, purity, and identity, but that may differ in characteristics, such as shape, scoring, configuration, packaging, excipients, including colors, flavors, preservatives, and expiration time;

“Interchangeable biological product” means:

A biological product licensed by the federal food and drug administration and determined to meet the safety standards for determining interchangeability pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 262(k)(4); or

A biological product determined by the federal food and drug administration to be therapeutically equivalent as set forth in the latest edition or supplement of the federal food and drug administration's “Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations,” also known as the “Orange Book”; and

“Prescriber” means an individual authorized by law to prescribe drugs.

Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 5; 2015, ch. 371, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 53-10-201 — 53-10-206 (Acts 1977, ch. 66, §§ 1-5, 9; T.C.A., §§ 52-1221 — 52-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 505, § 1; 1992, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 1), concerning substitution of generic drugs, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 2005. For provisions on affordable drugs, see this part 2.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added the definitions of “Biological product” and “Interchangeable biological product”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 371, § 3. May 4, 2015.

53-10-204. Substitution authorized — Instructions of prescriber.

The prescriber shall allow for substitution with a generic equivalent of a brand name drug or drug product under all circumstances, unless:

The prescriber determines the medical necessity of a brand name drug or drug product due to:

An adverse reaction previously experienced by the patient to a generic equivalent;

A generic equivalent has previously been demonstrated as ineffective for the patient; or

Any other clinically based prescriber determined need;

A generic equivalent is not available; or

Section 53-10-210 concerning notification to the patient and the prescriber have not been complied with in instances involving an anti-epileptic drug.

If the prescriber determines a brand name drug or drug product is medically necessary for a patient, the prescriber shall, in the prescriber's own handwriting, place the instruction showing intent upon the prescription at the time it is prepared and issued. For the purposes of this subsection (b), instructions showing intent may include, but not be limited to, the following language:

“Brand name medically necessary”, “dispense as written”, “medically necessary”, “brand name”, “no generic”;

Any abbreviation of the language in subdivision (b)(1); or

Any other prescriber handwritten notation, such as circling a preprinted instruction to dispense as written on the prescription order, that clearly conveys the intent that a brand name is necessary for this patient.

If the prescriber determines a brand name drug or drug product is medically necessary for a patient and that prescription order is issued verbally, the prescriber shall alert the pharmacist that use of the brand name drug or drug product is medically necessary for the patient.

If the prescriber determines a brand name drug or drug product is medically necessary for a patient and that prescription order is issued by the prescriber in the form of an electronic prescription order or facsimile prescription order, the prescriber shall place, or cause to be placed, the proper instruction on the electronic prescription order or facsimile prescription order prior to it being transmitted to the pharmacist.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a prescriber from informing a patient of the prescriber's professional opinion as to the capabilities, effectiveness and acceptability of any drug.

Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 6; 2006, ch. 564, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 370, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 53-10-201 — 53-10-206 (Acts 1977, ch. 66, §§ 1-5, 9; T.C.A., §§ 52-1221 — 52-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 505, § 1; 1992, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 1), concerning substitution of generic drugs, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 2005. For provisions on affordable drugs, see this part 2.

Acts 2007. ch. 370, § 3 provided that the general assembly finds, determines and declares that the act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety.

Cross-References. Affordable health insurance for the uninsured, title 56, ch. 7, part 6.

Medical Assistance Act, title 71, ch. 5, part 1.

Prescription drug programs, title 71, ch. 2, part 5.

Pharmaceutical connection program, title 71, ch. 5, part 5.

Volunteer Rx discount drug program, title 56, ch. 57, part 1.

53-10-205. Least expensive generic equivalent if authorized by prescriber.

When a pharmacist receives a written, verbal, electronic or facsimile prescription order, and the prescriber has not noted medical necessity of the brand name prescribed, as required in § 53-10-204, the pharmacist shall dispense the least expensive generic equivalent in stock, or a generic equivalent covered under the patient's drug plan, except as provided in subsections (c) and (d).

A pharmacist shall make a reasonable attempt to notify a prescriber if a generic equivalent has become available since the last dispensing of a prescription, and, if authorized by the prescriber, the pharmacist shall dispense the least expensive generic equivalent in stock, or a generic equivalent covered under the patient's drug plan.

If a pharmacist has reason to believe that the brand name drug or drug product is less expensive to the patient or patient's drug plan than the generic equivalent, the pharmacist shall fill the prescription with the brand name drug or drug product.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a pharmacist from complying with the request of a patient with a valid prescription order to obtain a brand name drug or drug product, if:

The patient has prescription drug coverage under a prescription benefit plan and agrees to pay the additional cost, if any, of purchasing the brand name drug or drug product, as that cost is determined according to the benefits provided by the patient's prescription benefit plan and when cost sharing that would be required to cover the additional cost is permissible under the patient's prescription benefit plan guidelines and all applicable laws and regulations; or

The patient does not have a prescription benefit plan or the patient's prescription benefit plan does not provide coverage for the brand name drug or drug product, and the patient agrees to pay the entire cost at the pharmacy of the brand name drug or drug product.

Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 7; 2006, ch. 564, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 53-10-201 — 53-10-206 (Acts 1977, ch. 66, §§ 1-5, 9; T.C.A., §§ 52-1221 — 52-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 505, § 1; 1992, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 1), concerning substitution of generic drugs, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 2005. For provisions on affordable drugs, see this part 2.

Cross-References. Affordable health insurance for the uninsured, title 56, ch. 7, part 6.

Medical Assistance Act, title 71, ch. 5, part 1.

Prescription drug programs, title 71, ch. 2, part 5.

Pharmaceutical connection program, title 71, ch. 5, part 5.

Volunteer Rx discount drug program, title 56, ch. 57, part 1.

53-10-206. Responsibility of pharmacist.

A pharmacist who selects a generic equivalent for substitution, pursuant to § 53-10-204, has the same responsibility for the selected drug as the pharmacist would in dispensing a prescription for the drug prescribed by the drug's trade or brand name.

Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 53-10-201 — 53-10-206 (Acts 1977, ch. 66, §§ 1-5, 9; T.C.A., §§ 52-1221 — 52-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 505, § 1; 1992, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 1), concerning substitution of generic drugs, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 2005. For provisions on affordable drugs, see this part 2.

Cross-References. Affordable health insurance for the uninsured, title 56, ch. 7, part 6.

Medical Assistance Act, title 71, ch. 5, part 1.

Prescription drug programs, title 71, ch. 2, part 5.

Pharmaceutical connection program, title 71, ch. 5, part 5.

Volunteer Rx discount drug program, title 56, ch. 57, part 1.

53-10-207. Contents of label.

The manufacturer, packager, or distributor of any human use legend drug sold, delivered or offered for sale in the state must have printed on the label of the immediate container of the drug the name and address of the manufacturer, packager, or distributor of the finished dosage form of the drug.

The pharmacist shall notify the patient of the substitution with a generic equivalent by noting the substitution on the prescription label.

This section shall not apply to prescriptions dispensed for inpatients of a hospital, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility, as defined in § 68-11-201.

Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 53-10-201 — 53-10-206 (Acts 1977, ch. 66, §§ 1-5, 9; T.C.A., §§ 52-1221 — 52-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 505, § 1; 1992, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 1), concerning substitution of generic drugs, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 2005. For provisions on affordable drugs, see this part 2.

Cross-References. Affordable health insurance for the uninsured, title 56, ch. 7, part 6.

Medical Assistance Act, title 71, ch. 5, part 1.

Prescription drug programs, title 71, ch. 2, part 5.

Pharmaceutical connection program, title 71, ch. 5, part 5.

Volunteer Rx discount drug program, title 56, ch. 57, part 1.

53-10-208. Source of products substituted — FDA approval required.

In making substitutions as allowed by this part, the pharmacist may use drugs and drug products manufactured within the territorial limits of any one (1) of the states of the United States, or of any other country, if the products have been approved by the federal food and drug administration (FDA), and have been given an “A” therapeutic equivalent rating by the FDA in the agency's publication, “Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations”, also known as the “Orange Book”. “A” rated drug products are those that the FDA considers to be therapeutically equivalent to other pharmaceutically equivalent products, including, but not limited to, drug products for which:

There are no known or suspected bioequivalence problems and are designated “AA”, “AN”, “AO”, “AP” or “AT”, depending on the dosage form; or

Actual or potential bioequivalence problems have been resolved with adequate in vivo or in vitro evidence supporting bioequivalence and are designated “AB”.

This section shall not apply to generic drugs and drug products that have not been rated.

For those drugs that have not been evaluated and rated for bioequivalency by the FDA, pharmacists are permitted to use their professional judgment in selecting a generic product for substitution.

Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 10; 2006, ch. 866, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 53-10-201 — 53-10-206 (Acts 1977, ch. 66, §§ 1-5, 9; T.C.A., §§ 52-1221 — 52-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 505, § 1; 1992, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 1), concerning substitution of generic drugs, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 2005. For provisions on affordable drugs, see this part 2.

Cross-References. Affordable health insurance for the uninsured, title 56, ch. 7, part 6.

Medical Assistance Act, title 71, ch. 5, part 1.

Prescription drug programs, title 71, ch. 2, part 5.

Pharmaceutical connection program, title 71, ch. 5, part 5.

Volunteer Rx discount drug program, title 56, ch. 57, part 1.

53-10-209. Construction.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as authorizing any person or entity to interfere with a prescriber's obligation to exercise independent medical judgment in rendering health care services to patients.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to interfere with or otherwise limit, constrain or alter the ability of any health plan or payor, including the bureau of TennCare, to utilize prior authorization in the implementation of a formulary or preferred drug list.

Acts 2005, ch. 434, §§ 11, 13.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 53-10-201 — 53-10-206 (Acts 1977, ch. 66, §§ 1-5, 9; T.C.A., §§ 52-1221 — 52-1226; Acts 1986, ch. 505, § 1; 1992, ch. 539, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 1), concerning substitution of generic drugs, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 434, § 2, effective June 17, 2005. For provisions on affordable drugs, see this part 2.

Cross-References. Affordable health insurance for the uninsured, title 56, ch. 7, part 6.

Medical Assistance Act, title 71, ch. 5, part 1.

Prescription drug programs, title 71, ch. 2, part 5.

Pharmaceutical connection program, title 71, ch. 5, part 5.

Volunteer Rx discount drug program, title 56, ch. 57, part 1.

53-10-210. Prescription drugs for epilepsy patients.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Anti-epileptic drug” means:

Any drug prescribed for the treatment of epilepsy; or

A drug used to treat or prevent seizures;

“Epilepsy” means a neurological condition characterized by recurrent seizures;

“Interchange” means the dispensing of one (1) manufacturer of an anti-epileptic drug for a different manufacturer of an anti-epileptic drug for which the patient is currently receiving therapy. This includes the substitution of a generic version for a brand version, a brand version for a generic version, or a generic version for a generic version by a different manufacturer; and

“Seizure” means a brief disturbance in electrical activity of the brain.

A pharmacist, pharmacy intern or pharmacy technician shall provide notification to the patient, a family member, other relative, or a close personal friend of the individual or any other person identified by the patient before interchanging one manufacturer of an anti-epileptic drug for another manufacturer of an anti-epileptic drug in instances where the patient's epilepsy or seizures are currently being controlled on a specific drug, strength, dosage form, and dosing regimen from a specific manufacturer. The prescriber of the medication shall also be notified prior to the interchange.

This section shall not apply to prescriptions dispensed for inpatients of a hospital, nursing home or assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201, or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33.

Acts 2007, ch. 370, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007. ch. 370, § 3 provided that the general assembly finds, determines and declares that the act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety.

53-10-211. Interchangeable biological products.

A prescriber shall allow for substitution with an interchangeable biological product of a prescribed biological product under all circumstances unless:

The prescriber determines the medical necessity of a prescribed biological product due to:

An adverse reaction previously experienced by the patient to an interchangeable biological product;

An interchangeable biological product having previously been demonstrated as ineffective for the patient; or

Any other clinically based, prescriber-determined need; or

An interchangeable biological product is not available.

If the prescriber determines a prescribed biological product is medically necessary for a patient, the prescriber shall, in the prescriber's own handwriting, place the instructions showing intent upon the prescription at the time it is prepared and issued.

For the purposes of this subsection (b), “instructions showing intent” includes, but is not limited to, the following language:

“Brand name medically necessary,” “dispense as written,” “medically necessary,” “brand name,” or “no generic”;

Any abbreviation of the language in subdivision (b)(1)(A); or

Any other prescriber handwritten notation, such as circling a preprinted instruction to dispense as written on the prescription order, that clearly conveys the intent that a brand name is necessary for this patient.

If the prescriber determines that a prescribed biological product is medically necessary for a patient and the prescription order is issued orally, the prescriber shall alert the pharmacist that use of the prescribed biological product is medically necessary for the patient.

If the prescriber determines that a prescribed biological product is medically necessary for a patient and the prescription order is issued by the prescriber in the form of an electronic prescription order or facsimile prescription order, the prescriber shall place, or cause to be placed, the proper instruction on the electronic prescription order or facsimile prescription order prior to it being transmitted to the pharmacist.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a prescriber or dispenser from informing a patient of the prescriber or dispenser's professional opinion as to the capabilities, effectiveness, and acceptability of any biological product.

A pharmacist who selects an interchangeable biological product for substitution, pursuant to this section, has the same responsibility for the selected product as the pharmacist would in dispensing a prescription for the product prescribed.

The manufacturer, packager, or distributor of any human use legend drug or biological product sold, delivered, or offered for sale in this state shall have printed on the label of the immediate container of the biological product the name and address of the manufacturer, packager, or distributor of the finished dosage form of the biological product.

The pharmacist shall notify the patient of the substitution with an interchangeable biological product by noting the substitution on the prescription label.

Within five (5) business days following the dispensing of a biological product, the dispensing pharmacist or the pharmacist's designee shall communicate to the prescriber the specific product provided to the patient, including the name of the product and the manufacturer. The communication shall be conveyed by making an entry in an interoperable electronic medical records system, through an electronic prescribing technology or a pharmacy record that can be accessed electronically by the prescriber, or as set forth in a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement as defined in § 63-10-217; otherwise, the pharmacist or the pharmacist's designee shall communicate to the prescriber the biological product dispensed to the patient, using facsimile, telephone, electronic transmission, or other prevailing means; provided, that communication shall not be required where:

There is no FDA-approved interchangeable biological product for the product prescribed; or

A prescription is not changed from the product dispensed on the prior filling of the prescription.

This section shall not apply to prescriptions administered to patients in a hospital, a nursing home, or an assisted-care living facility, as defined in § 68-11-201.

The notification and communication requirements in this section shall not apply to vaccines.

The board of pharmacy shall maintain a link on its web site to the current list of all biological products determined by the federal food and drug administration to be interchangeable biological products.

The pharmacist shall maintain a record of the biological product dispensed as required pursuant to § 53-14-110.

If the state of Tennessee mandates electronic medical records between a pharmacist and a prescriber as described in subsection (i), then the pharmacist shall only be required to communicate the biological product dispensed through an electronic medical records system when such a system is in place and the information is accessible to prescribers.

Acts 2015, ch. 371, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 371, § 3. May 4, 2015.